District of Columbia statutes.
47-2703

Personal effects, furniture, personal livestock may be sold without permit.

No permit as herein provided for shall be required for the sale of any wagon, carriage, automobile, mechanics’ tools, used farming implements, livestock, including game, poultry (dressed or undressed), vegetables, fruits, melons, berries, flowers, or for the sale of used household furniture and effects when being sold at the residence of the housekeeper selling them.

Sept. 8, 1916, 39 Stat. 847, ch. 473, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2703.
1973 Ed., § 47-2203.